trunk/apertium-sh-mk/apertium-sh-mk.mk.dix.xml
   <pardef n="полици/ја__n">
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>ја</l>
         <r>ја<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__f_sg_def"/>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>и</l>
         <r>ја<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__mf_pl_def"/>
     </e>
   </pardef>

   <pardef n="организаци/ја__n">
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>ја</l>
         <r>ја<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__f_sg_def"/>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>и</l>
         <r>ја<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__mf_pl_def"/>
     </e>
   </pardef>

   <pardef n="собрани/е__n">
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>е</l>
         <r>е<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__nt_sg_def"/>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l/>
         <r>е<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__nt_pl_def"/>
     </e>
   </pardef>


   <pardef n="ка/ва__n">
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>ва</l>
         <r>ва<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__nt_sg_def"/>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>фиња</l>
         <r>ва<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__nt_pl_def"/>
     </e>
   </pardef>


   <pardef n="пристаништ/е__n">
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>е</l>
         <r>е<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__nt_sg_def"/>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>а</l>
         <r>е<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__nt_pl_def"/>
     </e>
   </pardef>

   <pardef n="врем/е__n">
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>е</l>
         <r>е<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__nt_sg_def"/>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>иња</l>
         <r>е<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__nt_pl_def"/>
     </e>
   </pardef>


   <pardef n="пенкал/о__n">
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>о</l>
         <r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__nt_sg_def"/>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>а</l>
         <r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__nt_pl_def"/>
     </e>
   </pardef>

   <pardef n="град__n">
     <e>
       <p>
         <l/>
         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__nt_sg_def"/>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>ови</l>
         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__nt_pl_def"/>
     </e>
   </pardef>

   <pardef n="ог/ан__n">
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>ан</l>
         <r>ан<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__nt_sg_def"/>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>нови</l>
         <r>ан<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__nt_pl_def"/>
     </e>
   </pardef>

   <pardef n="вет/ар__n">
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>ар</l>
         <r>ар<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__nt_sg_def"/>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>рови</l>
         <r>ар<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__nt_pl_def"/>
     </e>
   </pardef>

   <pardef n="бра/т__n">
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>т</l>
         <r>т<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__m_sg_def"/>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>ќа</l>
         <r>т<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__mf_pl_def"/>
     </e>
   </pardef>

   <pardef n="ра/ка__n">
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>ка</l>
         <r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__f_sg_def"/>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>це</l>
         <r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__mf_pl_def"/>
     </e>
   </pardef>

   <pardef n="но/га__n">
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>га</l>
         <r>га<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__f_sg_def"/>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>зе</l>
         <r>га<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__mf_pl_def"/>
     </e>
   </pardef>

   <pardef n="сел/о__n">
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>о</l>
         <r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>а</l>
         <r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
   </pardef>

   <pardef n="прило/г__n">
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>г</l>
         <r>г<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>зи</l>
         <r>г<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
   </pardef>

   <pardef n="Југославија__np">
     <e>
       <p>
         <l/>
         <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__f_sg_def"/>
     </e>
   </pardef>



   <pardef n="Загреб__np">
     <e>
       <p>
         <l/>
         <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__m_sg_def"/>
     </e>
   </pardef>


   <pardef n="Бранко__np">
     <e>
       <p>
         <l/>
         <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__m_sg_def"/>
     </e>
   </pardef>

   <pardef n="Марија__np">
     <e>
       <p>
         <l/>
         <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__f_sg_def"/>
     </e>
   </pardef>

   <!-- Глаголи -->

    <pardef n="/е__vbser">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>сум</l>
          <r>е<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>си</l>
          <r>е<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>е</l>
          <r>е<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>сме</l>
          <r>е<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>сте</l>
          <r>е<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>се</l>
          <r>е<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>бев</l>
          <r>е<s n="vbser"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>беше</l>
          <r>е<s n="vbser"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>беше</l>
          <r>е<s n="vbser"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>бевме</l>
          <r>е<s n="vbser"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>бевте</l>
          <r>е<s n="vbser"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>беа</l>
          <r>е<s n="vbser"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>

   <e lm="пристаниште"><i>пристаништ</i><par n="пристаништ/е__n"/></e>
   <e lm="куче"><i>куч</i><par n="врем/е__n"/></e>
   <e lm="ливче"><i>ливч</i><par n="врем/е__n"/></e>
   <e lm="столче"><i>столч</i><par n="врем/е__n"/></e>
   <e lm="новороденче"><i>новороденч</i><par n="врем/е__n"/></e>
   <e lm="копче"><i>копч</i><par n="врем/е__n"/></e>
   <e lm="клипче"><i>клипч</i><par n="врем/е__n"/></e>
   <e lm="буре"><i>бур</i><par n="врем/е__n"/></e>
   <e lm="кафе"><i>каф</i><par n="врем/е__n"/></e>
   <e lm="галениче"><i>галенич</i><par n="врем/е__n"/></e>
   <e lm="камче"><i>камч</i><par n="врем/е__n"/></e>
   <e lm="капче"><i>капч</i><par n="врем/е__n"/></e>
   <e lm="делче"><i>делч</i><par n="врем/е__n"/></e>
   <e lm="младенче"><i>младенч</i><par n="врем/е__n"/></e>
   <e lm="филмче"><i>филмч</i><par n="врем/е__n"/></e>
   <e lm="собрание"><i>собрани</i><par n="собрани/е__n"/></e>
   <e lm="пенкало"><i>пенкал</i><par n="пенкал/о__n"/></e>
   <e lm="место"><i>мест</i><par n="пенкал/о__n"/></e>
   <e lm="пиво"><i>пив</i><par n="пенкал/о__n"/></e>
   <e lm="лице"><i>лиц</i><par n="пенкал/о__n"/></e>
   <e lm="полиција"><i>полици</i><par n="полици/ја__n"/></e>
   <e lm="децентрализација"><i>децентрализаци</i><par n="организаци/ја__n"/></e>
   <e lm="модернизација"><i>модернизаци</i><par n="организаци/ја__n"/></e>
   <e lm="цивилизација"><i>цивилизаци</i><par n="организаци/ја__n"/></e>
   <e lm="сензација"><i>сензаци</i><par n="организаци/ја__n"/></e>
   <e lm="демократизација"><i>демократизаци</i><par n="организаци/ја__n"/></e>
   <e lm="професионализација"><i>професионализаци</i><par n="организаци/ја__n"/></e>
   <e lm="фискализација"><i>фискализаци</i><par n="организаци/ја__n"/></e>
   <e lm="политизација"><i>политизаци</i><par n="организаци/ја__n"/></e>
   <e lm="категоризација"><i>категоризаци</i><par n="организаци/ја__n"/></e>
   <e lm="котизација"><i>котизаци</i><par n="организаци/ја__n"/></e>
   <e lm="амортизација"><i>амортизаци</i><par n="организаци/ја__n"/></e>
   <e lm="визуелизација"><i>визуелизаци</i><par n="организаци/ја__n"/></e>
   <e lm="колонизација"><i>колонизаци</i><par n="организаци/ја__n"/></e>
   <e lm="аклиматизација"><i>аклиматизаци</i><par n="организаци/ја__n"/></e>
   <e lm="нож"><i>нож</i><par n="град__n"/></e>
   <e lm="век"><i>век</i><par n="град__n"/></e>
   <e lm="влез"><i>влез</i><par n="град__n"/></e>
   <e lm="врв"><i>врв</i><par n="град__n"/></e>
   <e lm="глас"><i>глас</i><par n="град__n"/></e>
   <e lm="дел"><i>дел</i><par n="град__n"/></e>
   <e lm="дом"><i>дом</i><par n="град__n"/></e>
   <e lm="збор"><i>збор</i><par n="град__n"/></e>
   <e lm="клуб"><i>клуб</i><par n="град__n"/></e>
   <e lm="куп"><i>куп</i><par n="град__n"/></e>
   <e lm="пат"><i>пат</i><par n="град__n"/></e>
   <e lm="поп"><i>поп</i><par n="град__n"/></e>
   <e lm="фен"><i>фен</i><par n="град__n"/></e>
   <e lm="оган"><i>ог</i><par n="ог/ан__n"/></e>
   <e lm="ветар"><i>вет</i><par n="вет/ар__n"/></e>
   <e lm="брат"><i>бра</i><par n="бра/т__n"/></e>
   <e lm="рака"><i>ра</i><par n="ра/ка__n"/></e>
   <e lm="нога"><i>но</i><par n="но/га__n"/></e>
   <e lm="село"><i>сел</i><par n="сел/о__n"/></e>
   <e lm="кава"><i>ка</i><par n="ка/ва__n"/></e>
   <e lm="прилог"><i>прило</i><par n="прило/г__n"/></e>
   <e lm="предлог"><i>предло</i><par n="прило/г__n"/></e>
   <e lm="Марија"><i>Марија</i><par n="Марија__np"/></e>
   <e lm="Лабина"><i>Лабина</i><par n="Марија__np"/></e>
   <e lm="Бранко"><i>Бранко</i><par n="Бранко__np"/></e>
   <e lm="Петар"><i>Петар</i><par n="Бранко__np"/></e>
   <e lm="Дејан"><i>Дејан</i><par n="Бранко__np"/></e>
   <e lm="Слободан"><i>Слободан</i><par n="Бранко__np"/></e>
   <e lm="Британија"><i>Британија</i><par n="Југославија__np"/></e>
   <e lm="Википедија"><i>Википедија</i><par n="Југославија__np"/></e>
   <e lm="Грција"><i>Грција</i><par n="Југославија__np"/></e>
   <e lm="Јапонија"><i>Јапонија</i><par n="Југославија__np"/></e>
   <e lm="Романија"><i>Романија</i><par n="Југославија__np"/></e>
   <e lm="Србија"><i>Србија</i><par n="Југославија__np"/></e>
   <e lm="Франција"><i>Франција</i><par n="Југославија__np"/></e>
   <e lm="Македонија"><i>Македонија</i><par n="Југославија__np"/></e>
   <e lm="Австрија"><i>Австрија</i><par n="Југославија__np"/></e>
   <e lm="Белорусија"><i>Белорусија</i><par n="Југославија__np"/></e>
   <e lm="Унгарија"><i>Унгарија</i><par n="Југославија__np"/></e>
   <e lm="Кенија"><i>Кенија</i><par n="Југославија__np"/></e>
   <e lm="Португалија"><i>Португалија</i><par n="Југославија__np"/></e>
   <e lm="Загреб"><i>Загреб</i><par n="Загреб__np"/></e>
   <e lm="Београд"><i>Београд</i><par n="Загреб__np"/></e>
   <e lm="Пловдив"><i>Пловдив</i><par n="Загреб__np"/></e>
   <e lm="Скопје"><i>Скопје</i><par n="Загреб__np"/></e>
   <e lm="е"><i/><par n="/е__vbser"/></e>
